Alaska statutes. Title 18. Health, Safety, Housing, Human Rights, and Public Defender.
Chapter 60. Safety.

Cross references. —

For provisions concerning safety of dams and reservoirs, see AS 46.17.

Administrative Code. —

For occupational safety and health division, see 8 AAC, part 4.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The state has occupational safety and health jurisdiction over all non-maritime employment activities within the state’s territorial waters as defined by law.
February 16, 1982 Op. Att’y Gen.

The Alaska Department of Labor’s [now Department of Labor and Workforce Development] occupational safety and health section has jurisdiction on a military installation over all civilian employees who are not employees of the federal government. February 8, 1989 Op. Att’y Gen.

The Department of Labor [now Department of Labor and Workforce Development] does not have statutory authority to regulate the health and safety of volunteer workers. September 11, 1990 Op. Att’y Gen.